District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-1004

Name.

Repealed.

History

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 5, 41 DCR 3010
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-38, § 2(b), 42 DCR 3269
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-1004.
1981 Ed., § 29-1304.